Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 159.075 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A child of a military family may pre-enroll or participate in preadmission in a
school district if the parent or guardian of the child:
(a) Is transferred to or is pending transfer to a military installation or to a reserve
component within the state while on active military duty pursuant to an
official military order; or
(b) Is returning to the state within one (1) year of being separated from the
military with an honorable discharge, discharge under honorable conditions,
or a general discharge under honorable conditions.
(2) If a child meets the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section, a
school district shall:
(a) [A school district shall ]Accept the child's[an] application for enrollment and
course registration by electronic means[ for a child who meets the
requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section], including enrollment
in a specific school or program within the school district;[.]
(b) [A school district shall ]Not require the parent or guardian of the[a] child[
who meets the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section] to
appear in person for enrollment or course registration, including enrollment in
a specific school or program within the school district;[.]
(c) Take the necessary steps to ensure that comparable services are in place
prior to the child's arrival to his or her new location if the child has an
individualized education program or Section 504 plan. Necessary steps
include but are not limited to:
1. The prompt transfer of records and prior evaluations;
2. A determination on the need for reevaluation, if necessary. If a
Page 1 of 5
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1348
reevaluation is deemed necessary, the reevaluation shall occur within
thirty (30) calendar days after the child's date of arrival in the district,
subject to the informed consent of the child's parent or legal guardian,
in accordance with state and federal law; and
3. Meetings to ensure compliance with the child's plan; and
(d) Ensure that all requirements established in KRS 158.305 and 158.8402 are
provided without regard to the child's enrollment date if the child was not
enrolled at the start of the school year.
(3) The parent or guardian of a child who meets the requirements set forth in subsection
(1) of this section shall provide proof of residence to the school district within ten
(10) days after the arrival date provided on official documentation. The parent or
guardian may use, as proof of residence, military orders or the address of:
(a) A temporary on-post billeting facility;
(b) A purchased or leased home or apartment;
(c) Any federal government housing or off-post military housing, including off-
post military housing that may be provided through a public-private venture;
or
(d) A home under contract to be built.
(4) A child who utilizes this section shall not, until actual attendance or enrollment in
the school district:
(a) Count for the purposes of average daily attendance as defined in KRS 157.320
or funding under KRS 157.350; or
(b) Be included in the state assessment and accountability system pursuant to
KRS 158.6453 and[or] 158.6455.
(5) To accommodate for temporary housing, if a child utilizes this section to enroll in a
district, but the residence identified in subsection (3) of this section has not yet
become available, then the district shall allow the child to enroll and begin
Page 2 of 5
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1348
attending the district regardless of the child's temporary residence and subsequently
be included in the district's calculation of average daily attendance under KRS
157.320, for a period of up to one (1) year from the parent's or guardian's reporting-
for-duty date or separation date before being considered a resident of another
district.
Section 2. KRS 200.664 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon identification of an eligible infant or toddler with disabilities, representatives
of the entity serving as point of entry shall cause a multidisciplinary team, as
defined in KRS 200.654, to be created for the child and family.
(2) The multidisciplinary team shall develop an individualized family service plan, as
defined in KRS 200.654, for the child and family.
(3) The individualized family services plan shall include:
(a) A comprehensive multidisciplinary evaluation of the present level of
development of and services needed by the child and an assessment of and
plan to address the resources, priorities, and concerns of the family;
(b) An explanation of the multidisciplinary evaluation and all service options to
be made available in the family's cultural language, in their primary mode of
communication, or through a speech or language interpreter, whichever is
necessary to facilitate comprehension.
(4) The plan shall be developed within forty-five (45) days of the referral date of the
child and family to the point of entry. If the completion of the initial evaluation and
assessment is delayed and will not be completed within the forty-five (45) day time
period due to the request of the child's parent, illness of the child, or other
reasonable circumstances beyond the control of the multidisciplinary team, the
point of entry shall document the reason for the delay and shall develop and
implement an interim individualized family service plan.
(5) The informed written consent of the parent or guardian is required prior to the
Page 3 of 5
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1348
implementation of the plan. The parent may reject some services contained in the
plan, however, no services to which the parent consents shall be withheld if the
parent does not consent to all services in the plan.
(6) The parent or guardian shall sign an agreement to accept responsibility for being an
active participant in the child's plan and for learning skills from providers so that
the intensity and frequency of services may decline as the child reaches appropriate
developmental levels and the family is able to do more for the child.
(7) The plan shall be reviewed by members of the child's current multidisciplinary team
or other appropriate entities at no more than six (6) month intervals or more
frequently if deemed appropriate based on the needs of the infant or toddler and the
family. The child shall be evaluated at least annually to determine continuing
program eligibility and the effectiveness of services provided to the child.
(8) (a) For the purposes of this subsection, "child of a military family" means a
child whose parent or guardian:
1. Is transferred to or is pending transfer to a military installation or to a
reserve component within the state while on active military duty
pursuant to an official military order; or
2. Is returning to the state within one (1) year of being separated from
the military with an honorable discharge, discharge under honorable
conditions, or a general discharge under honorable conditions.
(b) If a child of a military family has an individualized family services plan, the
point of entry shall take the necessary steps to ensure that comparable
services are in place prior to the child's arrival to his or her new location,
including but not limited to:
1. The prompt transfer of records and prior evaluations;
2. A determination on the need for reevaluation, if necessary. If a
reevaluation is deemed necessary, the reevaluation shall occur within
Page 4 of 5
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:53 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1348
thirty (30) calendar days after the child's date of arrival in the state,
subject to the informed consent of the child's parent or legal guardian,
in accordance with state and federal law; and
3. Meetings to ensure compliance with the child's plan.
(c) To the extent possible, the point of entry shall not require the child's parent
or guardian to appear in person to complete required documentation or
participate in meetings to implement the child's existing plan.
Page 5 of 5
XXXX 1/14/2026 11:53 AM Jacketed